incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <pardef n="iti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iti</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>grem</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>greš</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gre</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>greva</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gresta</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gresta</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gremo</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>greste</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>grejo</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šel</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šlo</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šel</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šlo</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šel</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šlo</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šli</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šli</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šli</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šli</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šle</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šle</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šli</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šle</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šla</l>
          <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="iti"><i>iti</i><par n="iti__vblex"/></e>
